zh-CN: 中缸总成预期用途: 日常驾驶; 船用改装; 越野; 街道性能; 赛车/竞技; 原厂替换; 拖车/重载; 其他
es: Uso previsto del bloque corto: Uso diario; Conversión marina; Todoterreno; Calle de alto rendimiento; Carreras/competición; Reemplazo de fábrica; Remolque/trabajo pesado; Otro
ro-RO: Utilizare prevăzută pentru motorul scurt: Uz zilnic; Conversie marină; Off-road; Stradă - performanță ridicată; Curse/competiții; Înlocuire standard (stock); Remorcare/regim greu (heavy-duty); Altele
fi: Perusmoottorin käyttötarkoitus: Päivittäinen ajo; Venemuunnos; Maastoajo; Suorituskykyinen katuajo; Kilpailukäyttö; Alkuperäistä vastaava; Hinaus / raskas käyttö; Muu
en: Short block intended use: Daily driver; Marine conversion; Off-road; Performance street; Racing/competition; Stock replacement; Towing/heavy-duty; Other
de: Verwendungszweck des Shortblocks: Alltagsauto; Marine-Umbau; Offroad; Leistungsgesteigertes Straßenfahrzeug; Rennen/Wettbewerb; Serienersatz; Zugbetrieb/Schwerlast; Sonstige
ja: ショートブロックの用途: 日常運転用; 船舶転用; オフロード; パフォーマンスストリート; レース/競技用; 純正交換用; 牽引/ヘビーデューティー; その他
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση κάτω μέρους κινητήρα: Καθημερινή οδήγηση; Μετατροπή για σκάφος; Εκτός δρόμου; Οδήγηση υψηλών επιδόσεων στον δρόμο; Αγώνες/διαγωνισμοί; Αντικατάσταση εργοστασιακού; Ρυμούλκηση/βαρέος τύπου; Άλλο
hu: Félmotor (short block) rendeltetésszerű használata: Mindennapi használat; Hajó konverzió; Off-road; Teljesítményorientált utcai; Verseny; Gyári csere; Vontatás / nagy teherbírású; Egyéb
ru: Предполагаемое назначение шорт-блока: Повседневная езда; Адаптация для катеров; Бездорожье; Улучшенная динамика (Street); Гонки/соревнования; Замена оригинала; Буксировка/высокие нагрузки; Другое
sk-SK: Zamýšľané použitie krátkeho bloku: Každodenné jazdenie; Konverzia na loď; Terén; Výkonné pouličné; Preteky/súťaže; Sériová náhrada; Ťahanie/vysoká záťaž; Iné
hr-HR: Namjena kratkog bloka: Svakodnevna vožnja; Preinaka za plovila; Off-road; Ulične performanse; Utrke/natjecanja; Tvornička zamjena; Vuča / teški uvjeti; Drugo
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe delnega motorja: Vsakodnevna uporaba; Pomorska predelava; Terenska vožnja; Zmogljiva ulična vožnja; Dirke/tekmovanja; Tovarniška zamenjava; Vleka/težka obremenitev; Drugo
it: Uso previsto dello short block: Uso quotidiano; Conversione marina; Fuoristrada; Stradale ad alte prestazioni; Corsa/competizione; Ricambio di serie; Traino/uso intensivo; Altro
pl: Przeznaczenie krótkiego bloku: Do jazdy na co dzień; Konwersja na użytek morski; Off-road; Sportowa jazda miejska; Wyścigi/zawody; Zamiennik fabryczny; Holowanie/trudne warunki; Inne
da: Tilsigtet brug af short block: Daglig kørsel; Maritim konvertering; Offroad; Gadebrug (performance); Racer/konkurrence; Standardudskiftning; Bugsering/heavy-duty; Andet
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av kort veivaksel: Daglig kjøring; Maritim konvertering; Terreng; Gateytelse; Løp/konkurranse; Standard erstatning; Tauing / kraftig bruk; Annet
vi: Khối ngắn dự định sử dụng: Di chuyển hàng ngày; Cải hoán hàng hải; Băng đồng; Đường phố hiệu suất cao; Đua/thi đấu; Thay thế tiêu chuẩn; Kéo/tải trọng nặng; Khác
nl: Short block beoogd gebruik: Dagelijks gebruik; Maritieme conversie; Off-road; Performance street; Racen/competitie; Standaardvervanging; Slepen/heavy-duty; Overig
zh-TW: 中缸預期用途: 代步車; 船舶改裝; 越野; 性能街車; 賽車/競技; 原廠替換件; 拖曳/重載; 其他
th: บล็อกสั้นมีวัตถุประสงค์เพื่อการใช้งาน: ขับขี่ประจำวัน; ดัดแปลงใช้กับเรือ; ออฟโรด; รถแต่งใช้งานบนถนน; แข่งรถ/แข่งขัน; อะไหล่ทดแทนของเดิม; ลากจูง/งานหนัก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Trumpojo variklio bloko paskirtis: Kasdienis vairavimas; Jūrinė konversija; Bekelė; Gatvės sportinis; Lenktynės / varžybos; Standartinis pakaitalas; Vilkimas / didelėms apkrovoms; Kita
ko: 쇼트 블록 용도: 데일리 드라이버; 해상용 변환; 오프로드; 퍼포먼스 스트리트; 레이싱/대회; 순정 교체용; 견인/대형; 기타
tr: Kısa blok kullanım amacı: Günlük kullanım; Deniz aracı dönüşümü; Off-road; Performans/sokak; Yarış/müsabaka; Orijinal yedek; Çekme/ağır hizmet; Diğer
cs: Zamýšlené použití krátkého bloku: Běžné ježdění; Námořní přestavba; Terén (off-road); Sportovní jízda; Závody/soutěže; Základní náhrada; Tažení / vysoká zátěž; Jiné
sv: Avsedd användning för kortblock: Bruksbil; Marinkonvertering; Offroad; Prestanda för gata; Racing/tävling; Originalersättning; Bogsering/heavy-duty; Annat
pt-PT: Utilização prevista do bloco curto: Uso diário; Conversão marítima; Todo-o-terreno; Desempenho em estrada; Corrida/competição; Substituição de origem; Reboque/serviço pesado; Outro
fr: Usage prévu du bloc embiellé: Véhicule du quotidien; Conversion marine; Hors route; Performance urbaine; Course/compétition; Remplacement d’origine; Remorquage/usage intensif; Autre
bg-BG: Предназначение на късия блок: Ежедневно шофиране; За лодки/морски съдове; Офроуд; Спортно улично шофиране; Състезания; Замяна на заводския; Теглене/високи натоварвания; Друго
pt-BR: Bloco parcial do motor uso previsto: Uso diário; Conversão marítima; Off-road; Desempenho para rua; Corrida/competição; Reposição original; Reboque/uso pesado; Outros